ro-RO: Memorie pentru presetări de sintetizator: Presetări din fabrică + ale utilizatorului; Doar presetări din fabrică; Memorie de patch-uri limitată; Fără memorie de patch-uri (complet manual); Memorie de patch-uri pentru utilizator (reinscriptibilă); Altele
bg-BG: Памет за съхранение на звукови синтезаторни пачове: Фабрични + потребителски предварителни настройки; Само фабрични предварителни настройки; Ограничена памет за пачове; Без памет за пачове (напълно ръчно); Потребителска памет за пачове (презаписваема); Друго
hr-HR: Memorija za patch sintetizatora zvuka: Tvorničke i korisničke unaprijed postavljene postavke; Samo tvorničke unaprijed postavljene postavke; Ograničena patch memorija; Bez patch memorije (potpuno ručno); Korisnička patch memorija (mogućnost ponovnog pisanja); Ostalo
vi: bộ nhớ vá âm thanh của bộ tổng hợp âm thanh: Cài đặt sẵn của nhà máy + người dùng; Chỉ cài đặt sẵn của nhà máy; Bộ nhớ patch giới hạn; Không có bộ nhớ patch (hoàn toàn thủ công); Bộ nhớ patch người dùng (có thể ghi đè); Khác
fi: Äänisyntetisaattorin asetustiedosto: Tehdas- ja käyttäjäesiasetukset; Vain tehdasesiasetukset; Rajallinen ohjelmamuisti; Ei ohjelmamuistia (täysin manuaalinen); Käyttäjän ohjelmamuisti (uudelleenkirjoitettava); Muu
cs: Paměť patche zvukového syntetizátoru: Tovární a uživatelské předvolby; Pouze tovární předvolby; Omezená paměť patchů; Žádná paměť patchů (plně manuální); Uživatelská paměť patchů (přepisovatelná); Jiné
es: Memoria de parche del sintetizador de sonido: Ajustes de fábrica y de usuario; Solo ajustes de fábrica; Memoria de parches limitada; Sin memoria de parches (totalmente manual); Memoria de parches de usuario (reescribible); Otro
nb: Lydsynthesizer-patchminne: Fabrikk- + brukerforhåndsinnstillinger; Kun fabrikkinnstillinger; Begrenset patch-minne; Ingen patch-minne (helt manuell); Brukerens patch-minne (overskrivbart); Annet
zh-TW: 聲音合成器音色記憶: 原廠 + 使用者預設; 僅原廠預設; 有限音色記憶體; 無音色記憶體 (全手動); 使用者音色記憶體 (可覆寫); 其他
th: หน่วยความจำแพทช์เครื่องสังเคราะห์เสียง: พรีเซ็ตจากโรงงาน + ผู้ใช้; พรีเซ็ตจากโรงงานเท่านั้น; หน่วยความจำแพตช์จำกัด; ไม่มีหน่วยความจำแพตช์ (แมนวลล้วน); หน่วยความจำแพตช์ของผู้ใช้ (เขียนทับได้); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Pomnilnik barv zvoka zvočnega sintetizatorja: Tovarniške in uporabniške prednastavitve; Samo tovarniške prednastavitve; Omejen pomnilnik za popravke; Brez pomnilnika za popravke (popolnoma ročno); Uporabniški pomnilnik za popravke (ponovno zapisljiv); Drugo
lt-LT: Garso sintezatoriaus presetų atmintis: Gamykliniai ir naudotojo išankstiniai nustatymai; Tik gamykliniai išankstiniai nustatymai; Ribota tembrų atmintis; Be tembrų atminties (visiškai rankinis); Naudotojo tembrų atmintis (perrašoma); Kita
en: Sound synthesizer patch memory: Factory + user presets; Factory presets only; Limited patch memory; No patch memory (fully manual); User patch memory (rewritable); Other
pt-PT: Memória de patches do sintetizador de som: Predefinições de fábrica e do utilizador; Apenas predefinições de fábrica; Memória de patches limitada; Sem memória de patches (totalmente manual); Memória de patches do utilizador (reescrevível); Outra
fr: Mémoire de patchs du synthétiseur: Préréglages d’usine et utilisateur; Préréglages d’usine uniquement; Mémoire de patch limitée; Pas de mémoire de patch (entièrement manuel); Mémoire de patch utilisateur (réinscriptible); Autre
ko: 음향 신디사이저 패치 메모리: 팩토리 및 사용자 사전 설정; 팩토리 사전 설정 전용; 제한된 패치 메모리; 패치 메모리 없음(완전 수동); 사용자 패치 메모리(재기록 가능); 기타
el: Μνήμη patch συνθεσάιζερ ήχου: Εργοστασιακές + προεπιλογές χρήστη; Μόνο εργοστασιακές προεπιλογές; Περιορισμένη μνήμη patch; Χωρίς μνήμη patch (πλήρως χειροκίνητο); Μνήμη patch χρήστη (εγγράψιμη); Άλλο
de: Patchspeicher des Klangsynthesizers: Werks- und Benutzer-Presets; Nur Werks-Presets; Begrenzter Patch-Speicher; Kein Patch-Speicher (vollständig manuell); Benutzer-Patch-Speicher (wiederbeschreibbar); Andere
pt-BR: Sintetizador memória de patches: Predefinições de fábrica + do usuário; Apenas predefinições de fábrica; Memória de patch limitada; Sem memória de patch (totalmente manual); Memória de patch do usuário (regravável); Outro
zh-CN: 声音合成器音色记忆: 出厂设置 + 用户预设; 仅限出厂预设; 存储容量有限; 无存储容量（全手动）; 用户预设存储（可重写）; 其他
da: Patchhukommelse for lydsynthesizer: Fabriks- og brugerforudindstillinger; Kun fabriksforudindstillinger; Begrænset patch-hukommelse; Ingen patch-hukommelse (fuldt manuelt); Bruger-patch-hukommelse (overskrivbar); Andet
ru: Память патчей звукового синтезатора: Заводские и пользовательские пресеты; Только заводские пресеты; Ограниченная память патчей; Без памяти патчей (полностью ручное); Пользовательская память патчей (перезаписываемая); Другое
sv: Ljudsyntesens förinställningsminne: Fabriks- + användarförinställningar; Endast fabriksförinställningar; Begränsat patchminne; Inget patchminne (helt manuellt); Användarpatchminne (överskrivningsbart); Övrigt
pl: Pamięć ustawień syntezatora dźwięku: Presety fabryczne + użytkownika; Tylko presety fabryczne; Ograniczona pamięć brzmień; Brak pamięci (w pełni manualny); Pamięć użytkownika (z możliwością nadpisywania); Inne
nl: Geluidssynthesizer patchgeheugen: Fabrieks- + gebruikerspresets; Alleen fabriekspresets; Beperkt patch-geheugen; Geen patch-geheugen (volledig handmatig); Gebruikerspatch-geheugen (herschrijfbaar); Anders
hu: Hangszintetizátor patch-memóriája: Gyári + felhasználói beállítások; Csak gyári beállítások; Korlátozott memória a hangszíneknek; Nincs memória (teljesen manuális); Felhasználói memória (újraírható); Egyéb
it: Memoria patch del sintetizzatore sonoro: Preset di fabbrica + utente; Solo preset di fabbrica; Memoria patch limitata; Nessuna memoria patch (completamente manuale); Memoria patch utente (riscrivibile); Altro
ja: サウンドシンセサイザーパッチメモリ: ファクトリー + ユーザープリセット; ファクトリープリセットのみ; 限定パッチメモリ; パッチメモリなし (完全手動); ユーザーパッチメモリ (書き換え可能); その他
sk-SK: Pamäť pre zvukové presety syntetizátora: Továrenské a používateľské predvoľby; Iba továrenské predvoľby; Obmedzená pamäť na zvuky (patch); Bez pamäte (plne manuálne); Používateľská pamäť (prepisovateľná); Iná
tr: Ses sentezleyici preset (patch) belleği: Fabrika ve kullanıcı ön ayarları; Yalnızca fabrika ön ayarları; Sınırlı yama belleği; Yama belleği yok (tamamen manuel); Kullanıcı yama belleği (yeniden yazılabilir); Diğer